Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-167
Pawnee.

The county of Pawnee is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southwest corner of township one, north, of range nine, east; thence east to the southeast corner of said township in range twelve, east; thence north to the northeast corner of township three, north, of range twelve, east; thence west to the northwest corner of township three, north, of range nine, east; thence south to the place of beginning.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 40, p. 219;

R.S.1913, § 882;

C.S.1922, § 784;

C.S.1929, § 25-171;

R.S.1943, § 22-167.